src/inituppercase.regex
a (->) A, b (->) B, c (->) C, č (->) Č, d (->) D, d (->) D, e (->) E, é (->) É, 
ě (->) Ě, f (->) F, g (->) G, h (->) H, 
i (->) I, í (->) Í, j (->) J, k (->) K, l (->) L, m (->) M, n (->) N, ň (->) Ň, 
o (->) O, ó (->) Ó, ö (->) Ö, p (->) P, q (->) Q, r (->) R, ř (->) Ř, s (->) S, š (->) Š, 
t (->) T, u (->) U, ú (->) Ú, 
z (->) Z, ž (->) Ž,  y (->) Y || .#. _ ;
